Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1729
Revenue bonds; issuance.

For the purpose of constructing such parking facilities, the city and county may jointly issue revenue bonds. The principal and interest of such bonds shall be payable only out of the revenue and income of such parking facilities.

Laws 1969, c. 57, § 4, p. 360.